Hawaii statutes.
§428-106 Reserved name. (a) A person
may reserve the exclusive use of the name of a limited liability company or a
foreign limited liability company, including a fictitious name for a foreign
limited liability company whose company name is not available, by delivering an
application to the director for filing. The application shall set forth the
name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the
director finds that the name applied for is available, it shall be reserved for
the applicant's exclusive use for a one hundred twenty-day period from the date
of filing.

(b) The owner of a name so reserved may
transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the director a
signed notice of the transfer which states the name and address of the
transferee. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §89]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next